Utah statutes.
17-18-1.   Powers -- Duties of county attorney -- Prohibitions.
(1) (a)  In each county which is not within a prosecution district, the county
attorney is a public prosecutor and shall:
(i)  conduct on behalf of the state all prosecutions for public offenses
committed within the county, except for prosecutions undertaken by the city
attorney under Section 10-3-928 and appeals from them;
(ii)  institute proceedings before the proper magistrate for the arrest of
persons charged with or reasonably suspected of any public offense when in
possession of information that the offense has been committed, and for that
purpose shall attend court in person or by deputy in cases of arrests when
required; and
(iii)  when it does not conflict with other official duties, attend to all
legal business required in the county by the attorney general without charge
when the interests of the state are involved.
(b)  All the duties and powers of public prosecutor shall be assumed and
discharged by the county attorney.
(2)  The county attorney:
(a)  shall appear and prosecute for the state in the district court of the
county in all criminal prosecutions;
(b)  may appear and prosecute in all civil cases in which the state may be
interested; and
(c)  shall render assistance and cooperation as required by the attorney
general in:
(i)  all cases that may be appealed to the Supreme Court and shall prosecute
the appeal from any crime charged by the county attorney as a misdemeanor in
the district court; and
(ii)  investigations involving the Office of the Attorney General, including
those described in Subsection 67-5-18(3)(f).
(3)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  attend the deliberations of the grand jury;
(b)  draw all indictments and informations for offenses against the laws of
this state within the county;
(c)  cause all persons indicted or informed against to be speedily arraigned;
(d)  cause all witnesses for the state to be subpoenaed to appear before the
court or grand jury;
(e)  examine carefully into the sufficiency of all appearance bonds that may
be tendered to the district court of the county;
(f)  upon the order of the court, institute proceedings in the name of the
state for recovery upon the forfeiture of any appearance or other bonds
running to the state and enforce the collection of them; and
(g)  perform other duties as required by law.
(4)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  ascertain by all practicable means what estate or property within the
county has escheated or reverted to the state;
(b)  require the assessor of taxes of the county to furnish annually a list of
all real or personal property that may have so escheated or reverted; and
(c)  file a copy of the list in the office of the state auditor and of the
attorney general.
(5)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  each year on the first business day of August file a report with the
attorney general covering the preceding fiscal year, stating the number of
criminal prosecutions in the district, the character of the offenses charged,
the number of convictions, the amount of fines and penalties imposed, and the
amount collected; and
(b)  call attention to any defect in the operation of the laws and suggest
amendments to correct the defect.
(6)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  appear and prosecute for the state in the juvenile court of the county in
any proceeding involving delinquency;
(b)  represent the state in any proceeding pending before the juvenile court
if any rights to the custody of any juvenile are asserted by any third person;
and
(c)  prosecute before the court any person charged with abuse, neglect, or
contributing to the delinquency or dependency of a juvenile.
(7)  The county attorney shall:
(a)  defend all actions brought against the county;
(b)  prosecute all actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the county;
(c)  give, when required and without fee, an opinion in writing to county,
district, and precinct officers on matters relating to the duties of their
respective offices;
(d)  deliver receipts for money or property received in an official capacity
and file duplicates with the county treasurer; and
(e)  on the first Monday of each month file with the auditor an account
verified by oath of all money received in an official capacity during the
preceding month, and at the same time pay it over to the county treasurer.
(8)  A county attorney may not:
(a)  in any manner consult, advise, counsel, or defend within this state any
person charged with any crime, misdemeanor, or breach of any penal statute or
ordinance;
(b)  be qualified to prosecute or dismiss in the name of the state any case in
which the county attorney has previously acted as counsel for the accused on
the pending charge; or
(c)  in any case compromise any cause or enter a nolle prosequi after the
filing of an indictment or information without the consent of the court.
(9)  If at any time after investigation by the district judge involved, the
judge finds and recommends that the county attorney in any county is unable to
satisfactorily and adequately perform the duties in prosecuting a criminal
case without additional legal assistance, the attorney general shall provide
the additional assistance.
